Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-5506
Department of Agriculture; employ appraiser; costs.

(1) The Department of Agriculture, in consultation with the parties, may employ the services of a certified general real property appraiser when determination of market value is a matter in controversy or relevant to the hearing and determination of the matter in controversy.

(2) All costs incurred by the department hearing and determining all matters in controversy pursuant to the Agricultural Suppliers Lease Protection Act shall be paid equally by the parties.

Laws 2002, LB 435, § 6;

Laws 2006, LB 778, § 2.